Utah statutes.
72-4-206.   The Utah Fruitway.
(1)  There is established the Utah Fruitway comprising a section of Route 89
beginning at the Box Elder and Weber County line north to the south city limit
of Brigham City.
(2)  In addition to other official designations, the Department of
Transportation shall designate the portions of the highway identified in
Subsection (1) as the Utah Fruitway on future state highway maps.
